Utah statutes.
23-21-2.3.   Review and adoption of management plans.
(1)  The division shall submit the draft management plan to the Resource
Development Coordinating Committee created in Section 63J-4-501 and the
Habitat Council created by the division for their review and recommendations.
(2)  The division shall submit the draft management plan and any
recommendations received from the Resource Development Coordinating Committee
and the Habitat Council to:
(a)  the regional advisory council for the wildlife region in which the lands
covered by the management plan are located; and
(b)  the regional advisory council for any wildlife region that may be
affected by the management plan.
(3)  Each regional advisory council reviewing the draft management plan may
make recommendations to the division director.
(4)  The division director has authority to adopt the management plan, adopt
the plan with amendments, or reject the plan.
(5)  At the request of the division director or any member of the Wildlife
Board, the Wildlife Board may review a management plan to determine whether
the plan is consistent with board policies.
(6)  The division director may amend a management plan in accordance with
recommendations made by the Wildlife Board.
